North Carolina statutes. Chapter 1B. Contribution.
Article 2. Judgment Against Joint Obligors or Joint Tort-Feasors.

§ 1B-7.
Payment of judgment by one of several.

In all cases in the courts of this State wherein judgment has been, or may hereafter be, rendered against two or more persons or corporations, who are jointly and severally liable for its payment either as joint obligors or joint tort-feasors, and the same has not been paid by all the judgment debtors by each paying his pro rata share thereof, if one or more of the judgment debtors shall pay the judgment creditor, either before or after execution has been issued, the full amount due on said judgment, and shall have entered on the judgment docket in the manner hereinafter set out a notation of the preservation of the right of contribution, such notation shall have the effect of preserving the lien of the judgment and of keeping the same in full force as against any judgment debtor who does not pay his pro rata share thereof to the extent of his liability thereunder in law and equity. Such judgment may be enforced by execution or otherwise in behalf of the judgment debtor or debtors who have so preserved the judgment.

The entry on the judgment docket shall be made in the same manner as other cancellations of judgment, and shall recite that the same has been satisfied, released and discharged, together with all costs and interest, as to the paying judgment debtor, naming him, but that the lien of the judgment is preserved as to the other judgment debtors for the purpose of contribution. No entry of cancellation as to such other judgment debtors shall be made upon the judgment docket or judgment index by virtue of such payment.

If the judgment debtors disagree as to their pro rata shares of the liability, on the grounds that any judgment debtor is insolvent or is a nonresident of the State and cannot be forced under the execution of the court to contribute to the payment of the judgment, or upon other grounds in law and equity, their shares may be determined upon motion in the cause and notice to all parties to the action. Issues of fact arising therein shall be tried by jury as in other civil actions.

History.

1967, c. 847, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this Chapter, see 5 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 160 (1969).